Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 8

Derivative Proceedings and Equitable Remedies

48-249-801. Right to bring proceeding.

Manager-managed or director-managed LLC. A member or holder of financial rights of a director-managed LLC, or of a manager-managed LLC, may bring a proceeding in the right of an LLC to recover a judgment in its favor, if:

The member or holder of financial rights, as applicable, was a member or holder of financial rights of the LLC when the transaction complained of occurred; or

The member or holder of financial rights, as applicable, became a member or holder of financial rights through transfer by operation of law, from a person who was a member or holder of financial rights, as applicable, when the transaction complained of occurred.

Member-managed LLC. A member or holder of financial rights of a member-managed LLC may bring a proceeding in the right of an LLC to recover a judgment in its favor, if members or other persons with authority to do so have refused to bring the proceeding, or if an effort to cause those members or other persons to bring the proceeding is not likely to succeed.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-802. Complaint.

A complaint in a proceeding brought in the right of an LLC shall allege with particularity the demand made, if any, to obtain action by the directors, managers, officers, members or other persons with the authority to act, as applicable, and either that the demand was refused or ignored, or why the member or holder of financial rights, as applicable, did not make the demand.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-803. Discontinuance.

A proceeding commenced under this part may not be discontinued or settled without the court's approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially affect the interest of the LLC or a class of members or holders of financial rights, the court shall direct that notice be given to the members or holders of financial rights affected. If notice is so directed to be given, the court may determine which one (1) or more parties to the proceeding shall bear the expense of giving the notice, in such proportions as the court finds to be reasonable in the circumstances, and the amount of such expense shall be awarded as special costs of the proceeding and recoverable in the same manner as other taxable costs.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-804. Award of expenses.

Defendant's expenses. On termination of the proceeding, the court may require the plaintiff to pay any defendant's reasonable expenses, including attorneys' fees, incurred in defending the proceeding, if it finds that the proceeding was commenced without reasonable cause.

Plaintiff's expenses. If a derivative proceeding is successful in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of any such proceeding, the court may award the plaintiff its reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees. If anything is so received by the plaintiff, the court shall make such award of the plaintiff's expenses payable out of those proceeds and direct the plaintiff to remit to the LLC the remainder of anything received, and if those proceeds are insufficient to reimburse the plaintiff's reasonable expenses, the court may direct that any such award of the plaintiff's expenses, or portion of the expenses, be paid by the LLC.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-805. Equitable remedies.

If an LLC, or any officer, manager, director or member, as applicable, of the LLC, or other person with the authority to act for the LLC, violates a provision of this chapter, a court in this state may, in a proceeding brought by a member or holder of financial rights of the LLC, grant any equitable relief it considers just and reasonable in the circumstances, and, award expenses, including attorneys' fees and disbursements, to the member or holder of financial rights, as applicable.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.